Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB381.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.507 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The nonremarried spouse, regardless of age, and any child, stepchild, or orphan,
under the age of twenty-six (26), of a deceased veteran shall not be required to pay
any matriculation or tuition fees upon admission to any state-supported university,
community college, or vocational training institution for up to a maximum of one
hundred twenty-eight (128) credit hours of undergraduate instruction[junior
college, or vocational training institute for a period not in excess of forty-five (45)
months in order to obtain a diploma, nor in excess of the lesser number of months
required for a certificate of completion], if the deceased parent or spouse:
(a) 1. Served in the Armed Forces of the United States during a national
emergency, wars declared by Congress, or actions of the United
Nations; or
2. Died while on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States
regardless of wartime service; or
3. Died as a result of a service-connected disability acquired while on
active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States regardless of
wartime service; and
(b) 1. Was a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky at the time of death;
or
2. Was married to a resident of Kentucky at the time of death; and
3. If discharged, was under honorable conditions.
(2) In order to obtain the benefits conferred by subsection (1), the parent-child
relationship must be shown by birth certificate, adoption papers, marriage
certificate, or other documentary evidence. A stepchild must have been a member
of the veteran's household at the time of the veteran's death. The spousal
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 167
relationship must be shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary
evidence. The parent's or spouse's service and the cause of death must be evidenced
by certification from the records of the Kentucky Department of Military Affairs,
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs Records, or the Department of
Defense of the United States. In the event one so admitted to a state-supported
university, junior college, or vocational training institution under this section shall
have obtained a cash scholarship paid or payable to the institution, from whatever
source, the amount of the scholarship shall be applied to the credit of the applicant
in the payment of incidental expenses of attendance at the institution, and any
balance, if the terms of the scholarship permit, shall be returned to the applicant.
Section 2. KRS 164.515 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The spouse, regardless of age, and any child, stepchild, or orphan, under the age of
twenty-six (26), of a permanently and totally disabled member of the Kentucky
National Guard or Reserve Component injured while on state active duty, active
duty for training, or inactive duty training, or a permanently and totally disabled
war veteran, or a one hundred percent (100%) service-connected disabled veteran
regardless of wartime service, or prisoner of war or member of the Armed Services
declared missing in action shall not be required to pay any matriculation or tuition
fees upon his admission to any state-supported university, community college, or
vocational training institution for up to a maximum of one hundred twenty-eight
(128) credit hours of undergraduate instruction[institution of higher education or
to any state-supported vocational training school for a period not in excess of forty-
five (45) months in order to obtain a diploma, nor in excess of the lesser number of
months required for a certificate of completion].
(2) To be entitled to benefits under this section the parent or stepparent of the child
claiming benefits if living must be rated permanently and totally disabled for
pension purposes or one hundred percent (100%) disabled for compensation
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 167
purposes by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Department of
Defense. If the veteran is deceased, the claim to benefits is to be based on the rating
held by the veteran at the time of death or if a prisoner of war or missing in action,
must have been declared as such by the Department of Defense. Members of the
Kentucky National Guard must be rated permanently and totally disabled as
provided in KRS Chapter 342. The parent's, stepparent's, or spouse's service and
rating must be evidenced by certification from the records of the Kentucky
Department of Military Affairs, United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or
the Department of Defense of the United States.
(3) The parent-child relationship must be shown by birth certificate, legal adoption
papers, marriage certificate, or other documentary evidence. A stepchild must be a
member of the veteran's household. The spousal relationship must be shown by a
marriage certificate or other documentary evidence.
(4) To entitle a spouse, child, stepchild, or orphan to benefit under this section the
disabled member of the National Guard or Reserve Component veteran living or
deceased must have served on state active duty, active duty for training, or inactive
duty training or active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States, and his
discharge must have been under honorable conditions. He must be a resident or, if
deceased, have been a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(5) No provision of this section shall serve to deny these benefits to an eligible spouse,
child, stepchild, or orphan, who enlists, or who fulfills a military obligation, in the
Armed Forces of the United States and is discharged under honorable conditions;
the period of time spent in the military service to be compensated by like time,
beyond the age of twenty-six (26) years if required, but not in excess of the period
of enrollment as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The marriage of an eligible child, stepchild, or orphan, shall not serve to deny full
entitlement to the benefits provided in this section.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:12 PM Jacketed